District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.04

Additions to tax — Nonpayments.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 357, ch. 258, art. I, title XIII, § 4
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 79, ch. 154, § 14
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VI, § 606, 22 DCR 2113
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 503(c), 27 DCR 3390
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 404(e), 34 DCR 689
Sept. 21, 1988, D.C. Law 7-141, § 2(k), 35 DCR 5398
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 59(f), 45 DCR 745
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(dd)(2), 48 DCR 334

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2511.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1813.4.
1973 Ed., § 47-1589c.

Effective Dates

Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”